Tennessee, session 114, SB0034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1316, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(s)
(1) It is an offense to knowingly give, sell, lend, deliver, or otherwise
transfer a firearm to a person when the transferor knows or reasonably should
know that the person receiving the firearm is prohibited from purchasing or
possessing a firearm under state or federal law.
(2) A violation of this subsection (s) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to transfers of firearms made on or after such date.
SB0034
000533
- 1 -